North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-01 General Provisions
65-01-09.
Injury through negligence of third person — Option of employee — Organization subrogated when claim filed — Lien created.

When an injury or death for which compensation is payable under provisions of this title has been sustained under circumstances creating in some person other than the organization a legal liability to pay damages in respect thereto, the injured employee, or the injured employee’s dependents may claim compensation under this title and proceed at law to recover damages against such other person.

The organization is subrogated to the rights of the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents to the extent of fifty percent of the damages recovered up to a maximum of the total amount the organization has paid or would otherwise pay in the future in compensation and benefits for the injured employee. The organization also has a lien to the extent of fifty percent of the damages recovered up to a maximum of the total amount the organization has paid in compensation and benefits. The organization’s subrogation interest or lien may not be reduced by settlement, compromise, or judgment. The action against such other person may be brought by the injured employee, or the injured employee’s dependents in the event of the injured employee’s death. Such action shall be brought in the injured employee’s or in the injured employee’s dependents’ own right and name and as trustee for the organization for the subrogation interest of the organization. However, if the director chooses not to participate in an action, and the decision is in writing, the organization has no subrogation interest and no obligation to pay fees or costs under this section and no lien.

If the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents do not institute suit within sixty days after date of injury, the organization may bring the action in its own name and as trustee for the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents and retain as its subrogation interest the full amount it has paid or would otherwise pay in the future in compensation and benefits to the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents and retain as its lien the full amount the organization has paid in compensation and benefits. In the alternative, the organization may bring an action against a third party to recover its lien for benefits paid to the injured employee. Within sixty days after both the injured employee and the organization have declined to commence an action against a third person as provided above, the employer may bring the action in the employer’s own name or in the name of the injured employee, or both, and in trust for the organization and for the injured employee. The party bringing the action may determine if the trial jury should be informed of the trust relationship.

If the action is brought by the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents, or the employer as provided in subsection 2, the organization shall pay fifty percent of the costs of the action, exclusive of attorney’s fees, when such costs are incurred as the action progresses before recovery of damages. If there is no recovery of damages in the action, this shall be a cost of the organization to be paid from the organization’s general fund. After recovery of damages in the action, the costs of the action, exclusive of attorney’s fees, must be prorated and adjusted on the percentage of the total subrogation interest of the organization recovered to the total recovery in the action. The organization shall pay attorney’s fees to the injured employee’s attorney from the organization’s general fund as follows:

Twenty-five percent of the subrogation interest recovered for the organization before judgment; and

Thirty-three and one-third percent of the subrogation interest recovered for the organization when recovered through judgment entered as a result of a trial on the merits or recovered through binding alternative dispute resolution.

The above provisions as to costs of the action and attorney’s fees are effective only when the injured employee advises the organization in writing the name and address of the injured employee’s attorney, and the injured employee has employed such attorney for the purpose of collecting damages or of bringing legal action for recovery of damages. If an injured employee fails to pay the organization’s subrogation interest and lien within thirty days of receipt of a recovery in a third-party action, the organization’s subrogation interest is the full amount of the damages recovered, up to a maximum of the total amount it has paid or would otherwise pay in the future in compensation and benefits to the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents, no costs or attorney’s fees will be paid from the organization’s subrogation interest and the organization’s lien is the full amount of the damages recovered up to a maximum of the total amount it has paid.

The organization’s lien is created upon first payment of benefits. The lien attaches to all claims, demands, settlement proceeds, judgment awards, or insurance payable by reason of a legal liability of a third person. If the organization does not receive payment of its lien amount within thirty days of the payment of any recovery and if the organization has served, by regular mail, written notice of its lien upon the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents and upon the third person, the insurer of the third person, the injured employee or injured employee’s dependents, and the attorney of the injured employee or injured employee’s dependents are liable to the organization for the lien amount. A release or satisfaction of any judgment, claim, or demand given by the injured employee or the injured employee’s dependents is not valid or effective against the lien. An action to collect the organization’s lien amount must be commenced within one year of the organization first possessing actual knowledge of a recovery.

Upon receipt of its subrogation interest, the organization shall credit the medical expense assessment paid by the employer under section 65-04-04.4 to the employer’s account.

If the organization’s lien is not recognized by another jurisdiction, the organization may issue a decision, including a decision demanding repayment from the injured employee, of all benefits and compensation the organization has made on behalf of the injured employee, including costs and administrative fees.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 20; 1925 Supp., § 396a20; R.C. 1943, § 65-0109; S.L. 1949, ch. 355, § 1; 1951, ch. 343, § 1; 1955, ch. 354, § 7; 1957 Supp., § 65-0109; S.L. 1965, ch. 452, § 1; 1981, ch. 641, § 1; 1991, ch. 714, § 24; 1997, ch. 531, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 1; 2005, ch. 602, § 1; 2017, ch. 435, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

65-01-10.
Waiver of rights to compensation void — Deduction of premium from employee prohibited — Penalty.

No agreement by an employee to waive rights to compensation under this title is valid except as provided in section 65-05-25. No agreement by any employee to pay any portion of the premium paid or payable by the employer into the fund is valid, and any employer who deducts any portion of the premium from the wages or salary of any employee eligible for benefits under this title is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is subject to a penalty of up to five thousand dollars. The organization may reduce the penalties provided under this section. An employer may not appeal an organization decision not to reduce a penalty under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 21; 1925 Supp., § 396a21; R.C. 1943, § 65-0110; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 669; 1977, ch. 579, § 4; 1991, ch. 714, § 25; 2019, ch. 524, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

65-01-11.
Burden of proof in compensation matters — Death certificate.

If the organization or an employer claims an employee is not entitled to the benefits of the North Dakota workforce safety and insurance law because the employee’s injury was caused by the employee’s willful intention to cause self-injury, or to injure another, or by reason of the voluntary impairment caused by use of alcohol, recreational marijuana use, or illegal use of a controlled substance by the employee, the burden of proving the exemption or forfeiture is on the organization or on the person alleging the same; however, an alcohol concentration level at or above the limit set by the United States secretary of transportation in the Code of Federal Regulations in effect on August 1, 2011, or a level of an illegally used controlled substance or recreational marijuana sufficient to cause impairment found by a test conducted by a physician, qualified technician, chemist, or registered nurse at or above the cutoff level in the Code of Federal Regulations in effect on August 1, 2011, creates a rebuttable presumption the injury was due to impairment caused by the use of alcohol, recreational marijuana use, or the illegal use of a controlled substance. An employer who has a mandatory drug alcohol testing policy for work accidents, or an employer or a health care provider who has reasonable grounds to suspect an employee’s alleged work injury was caused by the employee’s voluntary impairment caused by use of alcohol, recreational marijuana use, or illegal use of a controlled substance may request the employee undergo testing to determine if the employee had alcohol, marijuana, or the controlled substance in the employee’s system at levels greater than the limit set by the United States department of transportation at the time of the injury. If an employee refuses to submit to a reasonable request to undergo a test to determine if the employee was impaired or if an employee refuses to submit to a test for drugs or alcohol after a work accident as mandated by company policy, the employee forfeits all entitlement to workforce safety and insurance benefits arising out of that injury. Any claimant against the fund, however, has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the claimant is entitled to benefits. If a claim for death benefits is filed, the official death certificate must be considered as evidence of death and may not be used to establish the cause of death.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 2; 1921, ch. 142, § 1; 1925, ch. 222, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a2; S.L. 1935, ch. 286, § 1; 1941, ch. 305, § 1; 1943, ch. 274, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0111; S.L. 1975, ch. 581, § 1; 1981, ch. 642, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 76; 1993, ch. 387, § 8; 1993, ch. 614, § 4; 1995, ch. 611, § 1; 1997, ch. 527, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2011, ch. 506, § 1; 2019, ch. 523, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 500, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021, provides, "

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims regardless of date of injury."

Partial Disability.

Where claimant remained physically impaired by his sensitivity from his burns, but his physical impairment alone did not justify partial disability benefits, claimant had to show that his injury prevented him from continuing his employment as a truck driver, and nowhere in the record was there any medical evidence that he could not have returned to work with the proper thermal equipment. Absent such evidence, the bureau reasonably concluded that the greater weight of the evidence indicated that he had not suffered a loss of earning capacity, and the bureau’s denial of temporary partial disability benefits was affirmed. Rooks v. North Dakota Workers' Compensation Bureau, 506 N.W.2d 78, 1993 N.D. LEXIS 174 (N.D. 1993).

65-01-12.
Attorney general to represent organization.

Upon the request of the organization, the attorney general shall institute and prosecute the necessary actions or proceedings for the enforcement of this title or for the recovery of any money due the fund or of any penalty provided for in this title, and shall defend all suits, actions, or proceedings brought against the organization or any of its employees in the attorney general’s official capacity.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 24; 1925 Supp., § 396a24; R.C. 1943, § 65-0112; S.L. 1965, ch. 453, § 1; 1989, ch. 295, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-01-13.
Information fund — Continuing appropriation.

There is created a fund to be known as the information fund within the workforce safety and insurance fund, to which the organization shall deposit all moneys received from private citizens, businesses, associations, corporations, and limited liability companies for providing these entities with publications and statistical information concerning workforce safety and insurance matters. The information must be provided at cost. The moneys in the fund are appropriated, as a standing and continuing appropriation, to workforce safety and insurance to pay publication and statistical processing expenses incurred by the organization.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 715, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 608, § 2.

65-01-14.
Informal decision by organization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 532, § 6.

65-01-15.
Yearly documentation required for firefighter and law enforcement officer.

Except for benefits for an exposure to a bloodborne pathogen as defined by section 23-07.5-01 occurring in the course of employment, a full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer who uses tobacco is not eligible for the benefits provided under section 65-01-15.1, unless the full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer provides yearly documentation from a health care provider which indicates the full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer has not used tobacco for the preceding two years.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 610, § 2; 1997, ch. 527, § 5; 2005, ch. 235, § 7; 2019, ch. 523, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

65-01-15.1.
Presumption of compensability for certain conditions of full-time paid firefighters and law enforcement officers.

Any condition or impairment of health of a full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer caused by lung or respiratory disease, hypertension, heart disease, or an exposure to a bloodborne pathogen as defined by section 23-07.5-01 occurring in the course of employment, or occupational cancer in a full-time paid firefighter, is presumed to have been suffered in the line of duty. The presumption may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence the condition or impairment is not work-related.

As used in this section, an occupational cancer is one which arises out of employment as a full-time paid firefighter and is due to injury due to exposure to smoke, fumes, or carcinogenic, poisonous, toxic, or chemical substances while in the performance of active duty as a full-time paid firefighter.

A full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer is not eligible for the benefit provided under this section unless that full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer has completed five years of continuous service and has successfully passed a medical examination which fails to reveal any evidence of such a condition. An employer shall require a medical examination upon employment, for any employee subject to this section. After the initial medical examination, an employer shall require at least a periodic medical examination as follows: for one to ten years of service, every five years; for eleven to twenty years of service, every three years; and for twenty-one or more years of service, every year. The periodic medical examination, at a minimum, must consist of a general medical history of the individual and the individual’s family; an occupational history including contact with and an exposure to hazardous materials, toxic products, contagious and infectious diseases, and to physical hazards; a physical examination including measurement of height, weight, and blood pressure; and laboratory and diagnostic procedures including a nonfasting total blood cholesterol test. If the medical examination reveals that an employee falls into a recognized risk group, the employee must be referred to a qualified health professional for future medical examination. If a medical examination produces a false positive result for a condition covered under this section, the organization shall consider the condition to be a compensable injury. In the case of a false positive result, neither the coverage of the condition nor the period of disability may exceed fifty-six days. This section does not affect an employee’s responsibility to document that the employee has not used tobacco as required under section 65-01-15. Results of the examination must be used in rebuttal to a presumption afforded under this section.

For purposes of this section, “law enforcement officer” means a person who is licensed to perform peace officer law enforcement duties under chapter 12-63 and is employed full time by the bureau of criminal investigation, the game and fish department, the state highway patrol, the parole and probation division, the North Dakota state university police department, the North Dakota state college of science police department, the university of North Dakota police department, a county sheriff’s department, a city police department, or the parks and recreation department pursuant to section 55-08-04.

The presumption does not include a condition or impairment of health of a full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer, who has been employed for ten years or less, if the condition or impairment is diagnosed more than two years after the employment as a full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer ends. The presumption also does not include a condition or impairment of health of a full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer, who has been employed more than ten years, if the condition or impairment is diagnosed more than five years after the employment as a full-time paid firefighter or law enforcement officer ends.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 527, § 4; 1997, ch. 529, § 2; 2005, ch. 235, § 8; 2007, ch. 566, § 1; 2009, ch. 610, § 1; 2013, ch. 500, § 1; 2015, ch. 480, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 525, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

65-01-16.
Decisions by organization — Disputed decisions.

The following procedures must be followed in claims for benefits, notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in chapter 28-32:

The organization shall send a copy of each initial claim form filed with the organization to the claimant’s employer, by regular mail, along with a form for the employer’s response, if the employer’s response has not been filed at the time the claim is filed.

The organization may conduct a hearing on any matter within its jurisdiction by informal internal review of the information of record.

The organization may issue a notice of decision for any decision made by informal internal review and shall serve the notice of decision on the parties by regular mail. A notice of decision must include a statement of the decision, a short summary of the reason for the decision, and notice of the right to reconsideration.

A party has forty-five days from the day the notice of decision was mailed by the organization in which to file a written request for reconsideration. The employer is not required to file the request through an attorney. The request must state the reason for disagreement with the organization’s decision and the desired outcome. The request may be accompanied by additional evidence not previously submitted to the organization. The organization shall reconsider the matter by informal internal review of the information of record. Absent a timely and sufficient request for reconsideration, the notice of decision is final and may not be reheard or appealed.

After receiving a request for reconsideration, the organization shall serve on the parties by regular mail a notice of decision reversing the previous decision or, in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, an administrative order that includes its findings, conclusions, and order. The organization may serve an administrative order on any decision made by informal internal review without first issuing a notice of decision and receiving a request for reconsideration. If the organization does not issue an order within sixty days of receiving a request for reconsideration, any interested party may request, and the organization shall promptly issue, an appealable determination.

An employee has forty-five days from the day the administrative order was mailed in which to file a request for assistance from the decision review office under section 65-02-27.

A party has forty-five days, from the date of service of an administrative order or from the day the decision review office mails its notice that the office’s assistance is complete, in which to file a written request for rehearing. The request must specifically state each alleged error of fact and law to be reheard and the relief sought. Absent a timely and sufficient request for rehearing, the administrative order is final and may not be reheard or appealed.

Rehearings must be conducted as hearings under chapter 28-32 to the extent the provisions of that chapter do not conflict with this section.

A party may appeal a posthearing administrative order to district court in accordance with chapter 65-10. Chapter 65-10 does not preclude the organization from appealing to district court a final order issued by a hearing officer under this title.

Any notice of decision, administrative order, or posthearing administrative order is subject to review and reopening under section 65-05-04.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 532, § 1; 1999, ch. 553, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 611, § 4; 2009, ch. 612, § 1; 2011, ch. 507, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 435, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 502, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 502, S.L. 2021 provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims, regardless of date of injury, which have a notice of decision issued after July 31, 2021.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

65-01-17.
Agricultural employment exemption — Custom agricultural operations.

For purposes of the agricultural service exception to hazardous employment under section 65-01-02, an agricultural employer that engages in a custom agricultural operation, which is the planting, care, or harvesting of grain or field crops on a contract-for-hire basis, exclusive of hauling by special contractor, retains the exemption unless the employer’s custom agricultural operations are based outside this state or require more than thirty actual working days of operation during the calendar year.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 577, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 2; 2005, ch. 610, § 2.

65-01-18.
Alternative dispute resolution — Pilot program — Continuing appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the organization may develop and implement pilot programs to allow the organization to assess alternative forms of dispute resolution to resolve disputes with injured employees. The goal of the pilot program must be to develop timely, cost-effective, and amicable options to resolve disputes during any stage in the claim adjudication or appeal process. A pilot program may address a broad range of approaches, including collaborative efforts between the organization and other public or private entities. Participation of an injured employee in the pilot program is voluntary. No more than fifty thousand dollars per biennium from the workforce safety and insurance fund is appropriated to the organization on a continuing basis for payment of organization expenses associated with the pilot program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 525, §
3, effective July 1, 2019.

65-01-19.
Pilot programs — Report to legislative management.

Annually the organization shall report to the legislative management on the status of any current pilot programs and pilot programs completed within the previous twelve months. The report must include a summary of findings and recommendations on each pilot program, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 526, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.